Hawaii statutes.
Subpart B.
Coverages and Assignment of Claims

§431:10C-407 Classifications. (a) The
commissioner shall establish classifications of eligible persons and uses for
which the joint underwriting plan shall provide both the required motor vehicle
insurance policies and any optional additional insurance an eligible person or
user applies for. The commissioner shall, by rule, establish, implement, and
supervise the joint underwriting plan, through the bureau, assuring that
insurance for motor vehicles will be conveniently and expeditiously afforded,
subject only to payment or provision for payment of the premium, to all
applicants for insurance required by this part to provide insurance for payment
of bodily injury and property damage liability insurance, or optional
additional benefits, and who cannot reasonably obtain insurance at rates not in
excess of those applicable to applicants under the plan, or who otherwise are
in good faith entitled to, but unable to obtain, the insurance through ordinary
methods.

(b) The plan shall provide all personal injury
protection benefits and services and bodily injury and property damage
liability coverages to the limits and coverages specified in this article for
all classes of persons, motor vehicles, and motor vehicle uses specified in
this part upon the payment of premiums as provided in subpart C, as follows:

(1) The plan shall provide personal injury protection
benefits and policies for each of the following classes, and each class shall
be able to secure a personal injury protection and bodily injury and property
damage liability policy through the plan:

(A) All motor vehicles owned by licensed
assigned risk drivers as the commissioner, by rules, shall define. The
commissioner shall regulate the class in accordance with the general practice
of the industry, the applicable results, if any, of the commissioner's
examination of the motor vehicle insurers' business records and experience, and
any applicable and scientifically credible governmental or academic studies of
the multi-accident or high-risk motor vehicle driver;

(B) All motor vehicles owned by licensed
drivers convicted within the thirty-six months immediately preceding the date
of application, in any jurisdiction of any one or more of the offenses of, or
of the offenses cognate to:

(i) Heedless and careless driving;

(ii) Driving while license suspended or revoked;

(iii) Leaving the scene of an accident;

(iv) Manslaughter, if resulting from the
operation of a motor vehicle;

(v) Operating a vehicle under the influence of
an intoxicant as provided in section 291E-61; or

(vi) Driving under the influence of an
intoxicating liquor as provided in section 291-4 or any drug as provided in
section 291-7, as those sections were in effect on or before December 31, 2001;

(C) All commercial uses, first class, defined
as any commercial use engaged in the transport of passengers for hire or
gratuity;

(D) All commercial uses, second class, defined
as any commercial, business, or institutional use other than the transport of
passengers as described in subparagraph (C) or the exclusive use of a vehicle
for domestic-household-familial purposes; and

(E) All other motor vehicles, not classified
under subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D), owned by licensed drivers who are
unable to obtain motor vehicle insurance policies and optional additional
insurance through ordinary methods;

(2) The plan shall provide personal injury protection
benefits and bodily injury and property damage policies for all classes of persons,
motor vehicles, and motor vehicle uses, at the premiums specified under subpart
C, at the option of the owners, for the following classes, which the
commissioner, by rules, shall further define and regulate:

(A) All licensed drivers, or unlicensed
permanently disabled individuals unable to operate their motor vehicles, who
are receiving public assistance benefits consisting of direct cash payments, or
who received public assistance benefits in the form of medical services prior
to July 1, 1994, and are still receiving the benefits, through the department
of human services, or benefits from the Supplemental Security Income program
under the Social Security Administration; provided that the licensed drivers,
or unlicensed permanently disabled individuals unable to operate their motor
vehicles, are the sole registered owners of the motor vehicles to be insured;
provided further that not more than one vehicle per public assistance unit
shall be insured under this part, unless extra vehicles are approved by the
department of human services as being necessary for medical or employment
purposes; provided further that the motor vehicle to be insured shall be used
strictly for personal purposes, and not for commercial purposes;

(B) Any licensed physically handicapped
driver, including drivers with any auditory limitation; and

(C) Any licensed driver who is a minor under
foster care and whose parents are unable to pay for the minor's motor vehicle
insurance as provided in [section 346-17.3].

Each category of driver/owner under
subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) may secure motor vehicle insurance coverage
through the plan at the individual's option; provided any previous motor
vehicle insurance policy has expired or has been canceled. Any person becoming
eligible for plan coverage under subparagraph (A) shall first exhaust all paid
coverage under any motor vehicle insurance policy then in force before becoming
eligible for plan coverage.

Any person eligible or becoming eligible
under rules adopted by the commissioner under subparagraph (B) or (C) may at
any time elect coverage under the plan and terminate any prior private
insurer's coverage.

A certificate shall be issued by the
department of human services indicating that the person is a bona fide public assistance
recipient as defined in subparagraph (A). The certificate shall be deemed a
policy for the purposes of this chapter upon the issuance of a valid motor
vehicle insurance identification card pursuant to section 431:10C‑107;
and

(3) Under the joint underwriting plan, the required
motor vehicle policy coverages as provided in section 431:10C‑301 shall
be offered by every insurer to each eligible applicant assigned by the bureau.
In addition, uninsured motorist and underinsured motorist coverages shall be
offered in conformance with section 431:10C‑301, and optional additional
coverages shall be offered in conformance with section 431:10C‑302, for
each class except the class defined in paragraph (2)(A), as the commissioner,
by rules, shall provide.

(c) The commissioner may further refine the
definitions of the classifications provided for in subsection (b). [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 253, §2; am L 1993, c 205, §29; am L Sp 1993, c 4,
§7; am L 1994, c 225, §1; am L 1997, c 251, §51; am L 1998, c 275, §31; am L
1999, c 142, §3; am L 2001, c 157, §32; am L 2006, c 289, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next